Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:(a) Licensed or certified behavioral health agencies are the essential safety net providers for adults, children, youth, and families experiencing mental health or substance use disorders in Washington;(b) In addition to providing clinical services and care coordination, licensed or certified behavioral health agencies serve as the training ground for students and new graduates pursuing behavioral health careers across sectors and settings, bearing the cost for the essential training and supervision infrastructure that sustains this crucial workforce development pipeline. Although there are other health care settings that are compensated for their interdisciplinary training and workforce development programs, including teaching hospitals and federally qualified health centers, the training role in community behavioral health is an unofficial and uncompensated one, resulting in significant costs related to supervising interns and new graduates when clinicians would otherwise be providing billable direct services to patients; and(c) Competition among agencies for employing behavioral health care workers is heightened and accelerating, and the compensation gap between community behavioral health care providers and other practice settings continues to grow. Because licensed or certified behavioral health agencies serve primarily medicaid enrollees and are reliant on inadequate medicaid reimbursement rates, they are unable to offer competitive compensation packages to their employees and they experience high turnover and vacancy rates as their workforce often leaves for other settings offering higher compensation, lower caseloads, and a less complex patient population.(2) The legislature intends to establish the behavioral health teaching clinic designation and enhancement rate to recognize and compensate licensed or certified behavioral health agencies, regardless of geographic location or tribal affiliation, for training the broader behavioral health workforce in cutting edge, critical behavioral health treatment modalities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:(1) The director shall designate licensed or certified behavioral health agencies that meet the state minimum standards described in this section as behavioral health teaching clinics. To be eligible for designation as a behavioral health teaching clinic, a licensed or certified behavioral health agency must:(a) Be a licensed or certified behavioral health agency in good standing with the department;(b) Train interns, trainees, or both;(c) Attest that its organizational admissions policies and procedures make the clinic equitable and inclusive to the populations that it serves;(d) Bill services rendered to clients by an intern or trainee and receive reimbursement only in accordance with payors' and the behavioral health agency's billing structures;(e) Compensate interns with, at a minimum, a stipend or honorarium in accordance with the teaching clinic payment structure as described in subsection (4)(a) of this section and when not prohibited by educational institutions;(f) Provide interns and trainees with physical or virtual space and resources similar to that of nonteaching clinic eligible staff functioning in a similar role;(g) Assign each intern or trainee to an appropriately credentialed supervisor;(h) Provide, at a minimum, the equivalent of one hour per week of clinical supervision using the methods and deliveries determined by the professional licensure standards of the profession that the intern or trainee is pursuing;(i) Require access to and oversight of an intern or trainee during the internship or training to be provided by an assigned supervisor who is employed or contracted by the teaching clinic, either in person or virtually;(j) Attest to having an active contract or agreement with each intern's educational institution or program, which must either be accredited or in the process of becoming accredited;(k) Attest to having formal orientation, training, and observation processes and describe how the program ensures that practice opportunities are provided to interns or trainees; and(l) Use continuous quality improvement strategies in the operational practices, clinical practices, and strategic planning.(2) Behavioral health teaching clinics designated under subsection (1) of this section must be reimbursed at an enhanced rate as described in subsection (4)(a) of this section.(3) Designation as a behavioral health teaching clinic is effective for three years from the date of issuance of the designation.(4) The authority shall collaborate with a statewide organization representing licensed or certified behavioral health agencies to establish a stakeholder group comprised of licensed or certified behavioral health agencies and shall contract with an actuarial firm to:(a) Finalize the rate methodology for an enhanced rate for designated behavioral health teaching clinics that builds upon previous rate estimates, including the behavioral health teaching clinic designation and enhancement rate demonstration project stakeholder report, prepared by the Washington council for behavioral health, December 2024; and(b) Develop a plan for incremental implementation of statewide designation of behavioral health teaching clinics by June 30, 2026.(5) Within its government-to-government relationship, the authority shall consult with tribes and tribal government behavioral health agencies to assure impacts of the teaching clinic designation and enhanced rate methodology on tribal providers are well understood and able to be implemented in a tribal behavioral health agency.(6) By June 30, 2027, the authority shall seek approval from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services to secure federal financial participation in the costs of the enhancement rate for operating a behavioral health teaching clinic.(7) The authority shall submit a progress report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025, and a final report by December 31, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:(1) Upon submission of its training program to the department, the department shall deem a licensed or certified behavioral health agency that is a designated behavioral health teaching clinic under section 2 of this act to have met all statutory and regulatory behavioral health agency training requirements.(2) The department, in consultation with the authority, licensed or certified behavioral health agencies, and statewide organizations representing licensed or certified behavioral health agencies, shall adopt rules to implement this section by June 30, 2026.Sec. 4. RCW 71.24.025 and 2024 c 368 s 2, 2024 c 367 s 1, and 2024 c 121 s 25 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" means a community-based facility or portion of a facility which is licensed or certified by the department of health and open 24 hours a day, seven days a week, offering access to mental health and substance use care for no more than 23 hours and 59 minutes at a time per patient, and which accepts all behavioral health crisis walk-ins drop-offs from first responders, and individuals referred through the 988 system regardless of behavioral health acuity, and meets the requirements under RCW 71.24.916.(2) "988 crisis hotline" means the universal telephone number within the United States designated for the purpose of the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system operating through the national suicide prevention lifeline.(3) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a short-term severe crisis episode of:(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020; or(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.(4) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(7) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose of providing community behavioral health programs, federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing residential services, resource management services, community support services, and other behavioral health services. This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the state psychiatric hospitals.(8) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" means an entity contracted with the authority to administer behavioral health services and programs under RCW 71.24.381, including crisis services and administration of chapter 71.05 RCW, the involuntary treatment act, for all individuals in a defined regional service area.(9) "Behavioral health aide" means a counselor, health educator, and advocate who helps address individual and community-based behavioral health needs, including those related to alcohol, drug, and tobacco abuse as well as mental health problems such as grief, depression, suicide, and related issues and is certified by a community health aide program of the Indian health service or one or more tribes or tribal organizations consistent with the provisions of 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l and RCW 43.71B.010 (7) and (8).(10) "Behavioral health provider" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.83, 18.205, 18.225, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced practice registered ((nurse practitioners))nurses.(11) "Behavioral health services" means mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, and co-occurring disorder treatment services as described in this chapter and chapter 71.36 RCW that, depending on the type of service, are provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies, behavioral health providers, or integrated into other health care providers.(12) "Behavioral health teaching clinic" means a licensed or certified behavioral health agency that meets the teaching clinic standards and billing eligibility as described in section 2 of this act to provide high quality, evidence-based training and clinical supervision to behavioral health interns and trainees.(13) "Child" means a person under the age of 18 years.(((13)))(14) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a mental disorder within the preceding two years; or(b) Has experienced a continuous behavioral health hospitalization or residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the preceding year; or(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. "Substantial gainful activity" shall be defined by the authority by rule consistent with Public Law 92-603, as amended.(((14)))(15) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides rehabilitation services and is licensed or certified by the department.(((15)))(16) "Community behavioral health program" means all expenditures, services, activities, or programs, including reasonable administration and overhead, designed and conducted to prevent or treat substance use disorder, mental illness, or both in the community behavioral health system.(((16)))(17) "Community behavioral health service delivery system" means public, private, or tribal agencies that provide services specifically to persons with mental disorders, substance use disorders, or both, as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding from public sources.(((17)))(18) "Community support services" means services authorized, planned, and coordinated through resource management services including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis intervention available 24 hours, seven days a week, prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill being considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are acutely mentally ill or severely emotionally or behaviorally disturbed discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service providers, recovery services, and other services determined by behavioral health administrative services organizations.(((18)))(19) "Community-based crisis team" means a team that is part of an emergency medical services agency, a fire service agency, a public health agency, a medical facility, a nonprofit crisis response provider, or a city or county government entity, other than a law enforcement agency, that provides the on-site community-based interventions of a mobile rapid response crisis team for individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis.(((19)))(20) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.(((20)))(21) "Coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system" means the coordinated operation of 988 call centers, regional crisis lines, certified public safety telecommunicators, and other behavioral health crisis system partners within each regional service area.(((21)))(22) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to establish a behavioral health administrative services organization, or two or more of the county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an agreement to establish a behavioral health administrative services organization.(((22)))(23) "Crisis stabilization services" means services such as 23-hour crisis relief centers, crisis stabilization units, short-term respite facilities, peer-run respite services, and same-day walk-in behavioral health services, including within the overall crisis system components that operate like hospital emergency departments that accept all walk-ins, and ambulance, fire, and police drop-offs, or determine the need for involuntary hospitalization of an individual.(((23)))(24) "Crisis stabilization unit" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.05.020.(((24)))(25) "Department" means the department of health.(((25)))(26) "Designated 988 contact hub" or "988 contact hub" means a state-designated contact center that streamlines clinical interventions and access to resources for people experiencing a behavioral health crisis and participates in the national suicide prevention lifeline network to respond to statewide or regional 988 contacts that meets the requirements of RCW 71.24.890.(((26)))(27) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.(((27)))(28) "Director" means the director of the authority.(((28)))(29) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(((29)))(30) "Early adopter" means a regional service area for which all of the county authorities have requested that the authority purchase medical and behavioral health services through a managed care health system as defined under RCW 71.24.380(7).(((30)))(31) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in subsection (((31)))(32) of this section.(((31)))(32) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome. "Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.(((32)))(33) "First responders" includes ambulance, fire, mobile rapid response crisis team, coresponder team, designated crisis responder, fire department mobile integrated health team, community assistance referral and education services program under RCW 35.21.930, and law enforcement personnel.(((33)))(34) "Immediate jeopardy" means a situation in which the licensed or certified behavioral health agency's noncompliance with one or more statutory or regulatory requirements has placed the health and safety of patients in its care at risk for serious injury, serious harm, serious impairment, or death.(((34)))(35) "Indian health care provider" means a health care program operated by the Indian health service or by a tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization as those terms are defined in the Indian health care improvement act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603).(((35)))(36) "Intensive behavioral health treatment facility" means a community-based specialized residential treatment facility for individuals with behavioral health conditions, including individuals discharging from or being diverted from state and local hospitals, whose impairment or behaviors do not meet, or no longer meet, criteria for involuntary inpatient commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW, but whose care needs cannot be met in other community-based placement settings.(((36)))(37) "Intern" means an individual in a bachelor's degree program, master's degree program, or educational institution or program, which must either be accredited or in the process of becoming accredited, who is seeking behavioral health training as part of the degree program.(38) "Licensed or certified behavioral health agency" means:(a) An entity licensed or certified according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW;(b) An entity deemed to meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department; or(c) An entity with a tribal attestation that it meets state minimum standards for a licensed or certified behavioral health agency.(((37)))(39) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.(((38)))(40) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment for, periods of 90 days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a) Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.(((39)))(41) "Managed care organization" means an organization, having a certificate of authority or certificate of registration from the office of the insurance commissioner, that contracts with the authority under a comprehensive risk contract to provide prepaid health care services to enrollees under the authority's managed care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW.(((40)))(42) "Mental health peer-run respite center" means a peer-run program to serve individuals in need of voluntary, short-term, noncrisis services that focus on recovery and wellness.(((41)))(43) Mental health "treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services or the authority, by behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, by managed care organizations and their staffs, or by treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the entities listed in this subsection, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.(((42)))(44) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in subsections (3), (((13), (51), and (52)))(14), (53), and (54) of this section.(((43)))(45) "Mobile rapid response crisis team" means a team that provides professional on-site community-based intervention such as outreach, de-escalation, stabilization, resource connection, and follow-up support for individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis, that shall include certified peer counselors as a best practice to the extent practicable based on workforce availability, and that meets standards for response times established by the authority.(((44)))(46) "Recovery" means a process of change through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life, and strive to reach their full potential.(((45)))(47) "Regional crisis line" means the behavioral health crisis hotline in each regional service area which provides crisis response services 24 hours a day, seven days a week, 365 days a year including but not limited to dispatch of mobile rapid response crisis teams, community-based crisis teams, and designated crisis responders.(((46)))(48) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in subsection (((31)))(32) of this section but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.(((47)))(49) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences and supports authorized by resource management services and which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally ill, adults who are chronically mentally ill, children who are severely emotionally disturbed, or adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill in nursing homes, residential treatment facilities, assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.(((48)))(50) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.(((49)))(51) "Resource management services" mean the planning, coordination, and authorization of residential services and community support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill; (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill; (c) children who are severely emotionally disturbed; or (d) adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by a behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include seven day a week, 24 hour a day availability of information regarding enrollment of adults and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual service plan to designated crisis responders, evaluation and treatment facilities, and others as determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, as applicable.(((50)))(52) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.(((51)))(53) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental health hospital;(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several areas of daily living;(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality development and learning.(((52)))(54) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, if applicable, to be experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW within the last two years;(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special education, or developmental disabilities;(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is mentally ill or inadequate;(ii) Changes in custodial adult;(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement outside of the home, for example, behavioral health hospital, short-term inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a correctional facility;(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or(vi) Homelessness.(((53)))(55) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements established by rules adopted and necessary to implement this chapter by:(a) The authority for:(i) Delivery of mental health and substance use disorder services; and(ii) Community support services and resource management services;(b) The department of health for:(i) Licensed or certified behavioral health agencies for the purpose of providing mental health or substance use disorder programs and services, or both;(ii) Licensed behavioral health providers for the provision of mental health or substance use disorder services, or both; and(iii) Residential services.(((54)))(56) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.(((55)))(57) "Trainee" means an individual behavioral health professional who is a prelicensure candidate gaining the supervision and supervised experience necessary to be a fully licensed behavioral health professional. The term includes licensed advanced social worker associates, licensed independent clinical social worker associates, licensed mental health counselor associates, licensed marriage and family therapist associates, certified substance use disorder professional trainees, and licensed psychological associates.(58) "Tribe," for the purposes of this section, means a federally recognized Indian tribe.--- END ---